Rhode Island statutes. Title 14 Delinquent and Dependent Children
Chapter 5 Treatment of Juveniles for Chemical Dependency

14-5-1.
Purpose of chapter.

The purpose of this chapter is to encourage juveniles who are chemically dependent to obtain treatment for substance abuse.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 665, § 1.

14-5-2.
Definitions.

For the purpose of this chapter, the following definitions apply:

“Child” or “minor” means any person under eighteen (18) years of age who is not married, is not a parent, or is not emancipated.

“Chemical dependency” means addiction to alcohol and/or other drugs.

“Licensed treatment facilities” means:

A licensed hospital located in Rhode Island which is accredited by the joint commission on the accreditation of hospitals;

An inpatient facility with residential rehabilitation treatment and/or detoxification programs as licensed by the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals and accredited by the joint commission on accreditation of hospitals. Treatment must be rendered under the direct supervision of a licensed doctor of medicine;

Day/evening treatment services and/or partial hospitalization services in a licensed hospital located in Rhode Island or in a facility licensed by the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals for substance dependency and substance abuse treatment;

A facility located in Rhode Island with non-residential treatment programs and facilities approved and licensed by the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals; or

An out-of-state facility which has been approved by the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals.

“Non-custodial, non-invasive treatment” means any treatment where the juvenile is not detained overnight or in any way against his or her will, and which consists only of counseling. This counseling can include help for personal problems and for coping with parental alcohol and drug problems.

“Parent” means a natural or adoptive parent, or a legal guardian.

“Qualified professional” means a physician, nurse, credentialed substance abuse counselor, certified social worker, or a licensed psychologist.

“Substance abuse” means abuse of alcohol and/or other drugs.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch, 665, § 1.

14-5-3.
Treatment of minors — Chemical abuse.

In all treatment of a child for substance abuse or chemical dependency, the licensed treatment facility shall require the parents of the child to participate in the treatment. Parental consent for treatment of a child shall be required, except as otherwise provided in §

14-5-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 665, § 1.

14-5-4.
Treatment without parental consent.

In the event a child refuses permission to contact parents to seek parental consent and if, in the judgment of a qualified professional, that contact would not be helpful or would be deleterious to the child who is voluntarily seeking treatment for substance abuse or chemical dependency, then non-invasive, non-custodial treatment services may be provided by a qualified professional without parental consent; provided, during the course of treatment, the qualified professional shall make attempts to obtain permission from the child to obtain parental consent for and parental involvement in the treatment services.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 665, § 1.

14-5-5.
Acknowledgment of treatment — Clinical record.

Before a licensed facility may provide treatment services to a child without parental consent, the facility must obtain written acknowledgement from the child authorizing his or her evaluation and receipt of treatment services. Before requesting that a minor sign that acknowledgment, the child must be:

Advised of the purpose and nature of treatment services;

Told that he or she may withdraw the signed acknowledgment and cease participation in the treatment service at any time;

Told that the facility will make attempts to convince the child of the need for involvement of other family members in treatment and the facility’s preference for parental consent for the rendering of treatment services; and

Advised that a medical/clinical record of his or her treatment services will be made and maintained by the facility.

The signed form shall be included in the child’s clinical record. The clinical record shall include full documentation of the reasons why treatment was provided without parental consent and of all attempts made prior to and during the course of treatment to obtain that consent.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 665, § 1.

14-5-6.
Custodial treatment.

Whenever a juvenile voluntarily seeks custodial, invasive treatment for substance abuse or chemical dependency, the parents must be notified and their consent obtained, except as otherwise provided in §

14-5-7

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 665, § 1.

14-5-7.
Parental refusal — Custodial treatment.

In the event that a minor voluntarily seeks custodial or invasive treatment, a qualified professional determines that that treatment is in the best interest of the minor, and the minor’s parents refuse to consent to treatment, the minor, or anyone on his or her behalf, may petition the family court for approval of treatment.

A judge of the family court shall, upon petition and after an appropriate hearing, authorize custodial or invasive treatment if the judge determines that the child is mature and capable of making his or her decision as to the need for treatment, or if the judge determines that the child is not mature but that the custodial invasive treatment requested by the child would be in the child’s best interests.

A child may participate in the hearing on his or her own behalf and shall be represented in the proceeding by legal counsel. Proceedings in the family court under this section shall be confidential and shall be given precedence over other pending matters, so that the court may reach a decision promptly and without delay so as to serve the best interests of the child.

A judge of the family court who conducts proceedings under this section shall make in writing specific factual findings and legal conclusions supporting his or her decision and shall order a record of the evidence to be maintained, including his or her own findings and conclusions.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 665, § 1.

14-5-8.
Possession of one ounce (1 oz.) or less of marijuana.

Notwithstanding any public, special, or general law to the contrary, possession of one ounce (1 oz.) or less of marijuana, as defined in §

21-28-1.02

, by a child under seventeen (17) years of age and who is not exempted from penalties pursuant to chapter 28.6 of title 21, shall constitute a status offense pursuant to §

14-1-3(11)(vii)

and forfeiture of the marijuana. The family court may order a substance-abuse assessment and, if recommended, substance-abuse treatment. The parents or legal guardian of any child under seventeen (17) years of age shall be notified of the offense.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 407, § 2; P.L. 2016, ch. 408, § 2.